District of Columbia statutes.
7-3102

One-year report.

The Addiction Prevention and Recovery Administration shall submit a performance report on the program to the Council no later than 30 days after the program has been in operation for one year. The report shall include documentation of the number of youths served, the rate of recidivism of youths served, the average cost of services per youth served, and how the program’s success rate compares to that of similar programs in other jurisdictions.

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 4213, 48 DCR 6981

History

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 3813 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).

Emergency Legislation